District of Columbia statutes.
2-1215.52

Golden Triangle BID.

(a)

The formation of the Golden Triangle BID, which shall include all taxable property within the geographic areas set forth in subsection (b) of this section, is hereby authorized and the BID taxes established in subsection (c) of this section are hereby imposed through the earlier of the expiration date of this subchapter [May 29, 2016] or the termination or dissolution of the BID.

(b)

The Golden Triangle BID shall be comprised of all taxable property within the following areas:

(1)

Square 70, Lot 195; Square 72, Lots 75 and 76; Square 73, Lots 80, 82, 84, 800, 858, and 876; Square 74, Lots 832 and 840; all of Squares 76, 78, 78s, 85, and 86; Square 99, Lots 49, 50, 52, and 53; all of Squares 100, 105, 106, and 107; Square 115, Lots 79, 81, 82, 84, and 85; all of Squares 116, 117, 118, 126, 127, 137, 138, 139, and 140; Square 159, Lots 75, 76, 82, 84, 814, 815, 816, and 855; all of Squares 160, 161, 162, 163, 164, and 165; Square 182, Lots 827 and 828; Square 183, Lots 91, 105, 106, 107, 111, 847, 857, 879, 880, and 881; Square 184, Lots 3, 69, 71, 804, 805, 842, 845, 849, 855, and 856; all of Squares 185 and 186; and Farragut Square.

(2)

Square 166, Lots 32, 33, 38, 41, 841, 859, and 7000; Square 168, Lots 50, 51, and 823; and Square 169, Lots 70 and 71.”

(3)

Square 166, Lot 42.

(c)

(1)

For the purposes of this subsection, the terms “Class 2 Property” and “Class 3 Property” shall have the same meanings as provided in § 47-813, as such provision is in effect on August 15, 2008.

(2)

The BID taxes for taxable properties in the Golden Triangle BID shall be:

(A)

For tax years 2009 and 2010:

(i)

(I)

Eleven cents for each net rentable square foot of improved Class 2 Property and Class 3 Property, excluding hotels, for any property for which the owner is required to report net rentable area to the Office of Tax and Revenue or for which the Office of Tax and Revenue has records indicating the net rentable area of the property.

(II)

Net rentable square feet shall be the number of net rentable square feet reported to, or on record with, the Office of Tax and Revenue;

(ii)

(I)

Eleven cents for each equivalent net rentable square foot of improvements of improved Class 2 Property and Class 3 Property, excluding hotels, for any property for which the owner is not required to report net rentable area to the Office of Tax and Revenue and for which the Office of Tax and Revenue maintains no record of net rentable area.

(II)

Equivalent net rentable area shall be 90% of the gross building area.

(III)

Gross building area shall be determined using any method that is recognized generally in the District metropolitan area as an appropriate method for measuring gross building area; and

(iii)

(I)

Eight cents for each equivalent net rentable square foot of improvements of hotels.

(II)

Equivalent net rentable areas shall be 90% of the gross building area; and

(B)

For tax years 2011 and thereafter:

(i)

(I)

Fourteen and one-half cents for each net rentable square foot of improved Class 2 Property and Class 3 Property, excluding hotels, for any property for which the owner is required to report net rentable area to the Office of Tax and Revenue or for which the Office of Tax and Revenue has records indicating the net rentable area of the property.

(II)

Net rentable square feet shall be the number of net rentable square feet reported to, or on record with, the Office of Tax and Revenue;

(ii)

(I)

Fourteen and one-half cents for each equivalent net rentable square foot of improvements of improved Class 2 Property and Class 3 Property, excluding hotels, for any property for which the owner is not required to report net rentable area to the Office of Tax and Revenue and for which the Office of Tax and Revenue maintains no record of net rentable area.

(II)

Equivalent net rentable area shall be 90% of the gross building area; and

(iii)

(I)

Eleven and one-half cents for each equivalent net rentable square foot of improvements of hotels.

(II)

Equivalent net rentable areas shall be 90% of the gross building area.

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-134, § 202
as added Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-257, § 2(d), 52 DCR 1161
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 140(c), 52 DCR 10637
Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-212, § 2, 55 DCR 6987
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-161, § 2(q), 61 DCR 10741
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(q) of the Business Improvement Districts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-582, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1269, 21 STAT 735).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(q) of the Business Improvement Districts Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-435, Oct. 7, 2014, 61 DCR 10717, 20 STAT 4154).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-161 substituted “taxable” for “nonexempt real” throughout the section.
D.C. Law 17-212 added subsec. (b)(3); and rewrote subsec. (c).
D.C. Law 16-91 made a technical change in the enacting clause of D.C. Law 15-257 which resulted in no change in text.